Hawaii statutes.
§501-12 Salaries and expenses. The
judge of the court, the registrar, and the authorized clerks and assistants
shall receive such salaries as are appropriated by the legislature. In the
absence of such provision all salaries of officers or employees or fees of
examiners of title shall be paid out of the appropriation for expenses of the
court, according to a schedule fixed by the governor. [L 1903, c 56, §13; am L
1904, c 7, §1; am L 1913, c 21, §1; RL 1925, §3202; am L 1927, c 258, §2; RL
1935, §5011; RL 1945, §12611; RL 1955, §342-12; HRS §501-12]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next